North Carolina, session 2025, SB158.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Young Men's Christian
Association of Greater Charlotte to enable the McCrorey YMCA to provide its Flying Classroom
program, a unique educational experience that facilitates student engagement through
expeditionary and immersive learning experiences in science, technology, mathematics, and
literacy.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S158-v-1*